zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 戶外遊戲 > 梨球: 繩球桿; 繩球組; 繩球用球
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Udendørsspil > Stangtennis: Stangtennispæle; Stangtennissæt; Stangtennisbolde
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Exteriérové hry > Tetherball: Stĺpy pre tetherball; Súpravy pre tetherball; Loptičky pre tetherball
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Игры на открытом воздухе > Тетербол: Стойки для тетербола; Наборы для тетербола; Мячи для тетербола
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 야외 놀이 > 테더볼: 테더볼 장대; 테더볼 세트; 테더볼 공
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Lauko žaidimai > Teterbolas: Teterbolo stulpai; Teterbolo rinkiniai; Teterbolo kamuoliai
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Igre na otvorenom > Tetherball: Stupovi za tetherball; Setovi za tetherball; Lopte za tetherball
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Trò chơi ngoài trời > Tetherball: Gậy bóng đẩy; Bộ bóng đẩy; Bóng đẩy
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Jocuri în aer liber > Tetherball: Stâlpi pentru tetherball; Seturi de tetherball; Mingi de tetherball
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Gry na świeżym powietrzu > Piłka uwięziowa: Słupki do gry w piłkę na uwięzi; Zestawy do gry w piłkę na uwięzi; Piłki do gry w piłkę na uwięzi
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Szabadtéri játékok > Tetherball: Tetherball-oszlopok; Tetherball-készletek; Tetherballok
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 户外游戏 > 绳球: 绳球立柱; 绳球套装; 绳球用球
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Ulkopelit > Salkopallo: Salkopallotolpat; Salkopallosetit; Salkopallot
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Zahradní a venkovní hry > Tetherball: Stožáry na tetherball; Sady na tetherball; Míčky na tetherball
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Buitenspelen > Tetherbal: Palen voor tetherball; Tetherball-sets; Ballen voor tetherball
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Giochi all'aperto > Tetherball: Pali da tetherball; Set da tetherball; Palle da tetherball
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Jogos de exterior > Tetherball: Postes de Tetherball; Conjuntos de Tetherball; Bolas de Tetherball
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Igre na prostem > Tetherball: Palice za tetherball; Kompleti za tetherball; Žoge za tetherball
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Παιχνίδια εξωτερικού χώρου > Tetherball: Στύλοι Tetherball; Σετ Tetherball; Μπάλες Tetherballs
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Açık Hava Sporları > Tetherball: Teterbol Direkleri; Teterbol Setleri; Teterbol Topları
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Outdoor Games > Tetherball: Tetherball Poles; Tetherball Sets; Tetherballs
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Juegos al aire libre > Espirobol: Postes para espirobol; Conjuntos para espirobol; Pelotas para espirobol
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Spiele im Freien > Tetherball: Tetherball-Stangen; Tetherball-Sets; Tetherball-Bälle
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Jeux d'extérieur > Spirobole: Poteaux de spiroballe; Jeux de spiroballe; Balles de spiroballe
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > เกมกลางแจ้ง > เทเธอร์บอล: เสาเทดเดอร์บอล; ชุดเทดเดอร์บอล; ลูกเทดเดอร์บอล
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Jogos ao ar livre > Espirobol: Mastros de espirobol; Conjuntos de espirobol; Bolas de espirobol
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Utomhuslek > Tetherball: Tetherball-stativ; Tetherball-paket; Bollar för tetherball
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Utendørsspill > Smashball: Smashballstenger; Smashballsett; Smashballer
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > 屋外ゲーム > テザーボール: テザーボール用ポール; テザーボールセット; テザーボール
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Игри на открито > Тетърбол: Пилони за тетърбол; Комплекти за тетърбол; Топки за тетърбол